Utah statutes.
70A-2-312.   Warranty of title and against infringement -- Buyer's
obligation against infringement.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2) there is in a contract for sale a warranty by
the seller that
(a)  the title conveyed shall be good, and its transfer rightful; and
(b)  the goods shall be delivered free from any security interest or other
lien or encumbrance of which the buyer at the time of contracting has no
knowledge.
(2)  A warranty under Subsection (1) will be excluded or modified only by
specific language or by circumstances which give the buyer reason to know that
the person selling does not claim title in himself or that he is purporting to
sell only such right or title as he or a third person may have.
(3)  Unless otherwise agreed a seller who is a merchant regularly dealing in
goods of the kind warrants that the goods shall be delivered free of the
rightful claim of any third person by way of infringement or the like but a
buyer who furnishes specifications to the seller must hold the seller harmless
against any such claim which arises out of compliance with the specifications.
